zh-CN: 变调夹覆盖的部分琴弦: 弦 1-3; 弦 1-4; 弦 1-5; 弦 2-4; 弦 2-5; 弦 2-6; 弦 3-5; 弦 3-6; 弦 4-6; 其他
nb: Strenger dekket av delvis capo: Streng 1–3; Streng 1–4; Streng 1–5; Streng 2–4; Streng 2–5; Streng 2–6; Streng 3–5; Streng 3–6; Streng 4–6; Annet
hr-HR: Skraćeni kapodaster prekrivene žice: Žice 1 – 3; Žice 1 – 4; Žice 1 – 5; Žice 2 – 4; Žice 2 – 5; Žice 2 – 6; Žice 3 – 5; Žice 3 – 6; Žice 4 – 6; Ostalo
sl-SI: Pokrite strune delne kapodastre: Strune 1–3; Strune 1–4; Strune 1–5; Strune 2–4; Strune 2–5; Strune 2–6; Strune 3–5; Strune 3–6; Strune 4–6; Drugo
ja: 部分的にカポがかぶっているストリング: 弦1～3; 弦1～4; 弦1～5; 弦2～4; 弦2～5; 弦2～6; 弦3～5; 弦3～6; 弦4～6; その他
fr: Cordes concernées par le capodastre partiel: Cordes 1 à 3; Cordes 1 à 4; Cordes 1 à 5; Cordes 2 à 4; Cordes 2 à 5; Cordes 2 à 6; Cordes 3 à 5; Cordes 3 à 6; Cordes 4 à 6; Autre
de: Vom Teilcapo abgedeckte Saiten: Saiten 1–3; Saiten 1–4; Saiten 1–5; Saiten 2–4; Saiten 2–5; Saiten 2–6; Saiten 3–5; Saiten 3–6; Saiten 4–6; Sonstige
pt-BR: Cordas cobertas pelo capotraste parcial: Cordas 1–3; Cordas 1–4; Cordas 1–5; Cordas 2–4; Cordas 2–5; Cordas 2–6; Cordas 3–5; Cordas 3–6; Cordas 4–6; Outro
nl: Partial capo bedekte snaren: Snaren 1-3; Snaren 1-4; Snaren 1-5; Snaren 2-4; Snaren 2-5; Snaren 2-6; Snaren 3-5; Snaren 3-6; Snaren 4-6; Overig
lt-LT: Dalinio kapodastro dengiamos stygos: 1–3 stygos; 1–4 stygos; 1–5 stygos; 2–4 stygos; 2–5 stygos; 2–6 stygos; 3–5 stygos; 3–6 stygos; 4–6 stygos; Kita
hu: Részleges capo által lefedett húrok: 1–3. húr; 1–4. húr; 1–5. húr; 2–4. húr; 2–5. húr; 2–6. húr; 3–5. húr; 3–6. húr; 4–6. húr; Egyéb
th: คาโป้บางส่วนครอบคลุมอยู่: สาย 1–3; สาย 1–4; สาย 1–5; สาย 2–4; สาย 2–5; สาย 2–6; สาย 3–5; สาย 3–6; สาย 4–6; อื่นๆ
sv: Strängar som täcks av partiell capo: Sträng 1–3; Sträng 1–4; Sträng 1–5; Sträng 2–4; Sträng 2–5; Sträng 2–6; Sträng 3–5; Sträng 3–6; Sträng 4–6; Övrigt
da: Delvis capos dækkede strenge: Strenge 1-3; Strenge 1-4; Strenge 1-5; Strenge 2-4; Strenge 2-5; Strenge 2-6; Strenge 3-5; Strenge 3-6; Strenge 4-6; Andet
it: Corde coperte dal capotasto parziale: Corde 1-3; Corde 1-4; Corde 1-5; Corde 2-4; Corde 2-5; Corde 2-6; Corde 3-5; Corde 3-6; Corde 4-6; Altro
sk-SK: Struny zakryté čiastočným kapodastrom: Struny 1 – 3; Struny 1 – 4; Struny 1 – 5; Struny 2 – 4; Struny 2 – 5; Struny 2 – 6; Struny 3 – 5; Struny 3 – 6; Struny 4 – 6; Iné
es: Capo parcial cubierto cadena: Cuerdas 1-3; Cuerdas 1-4; Cuerdas 1-5; Cuerdas 2-4; Cuerdas 2-5; Cuerdas 2-6; Cuerdas 3-5; Cuerdas 3-6; Cuerdas 4-6; Otro
el: Χορδές με μερικό κάλυμμα καπάκι: Χορδές 1–3; Χορδές 1–4; Χορδές 1–5; Χορδές 2–4; Χορδές 2–5; Χορδές 2–6; Χορδές 3–5; Χορδές 3–6; Χορδές 4–6; Άλλο
cs: Struny zakryté částečným kapodastrem: Struny 1–3; Struny 1–4; Struny 1–5; Struny 2–4; Struny 2–5; Struny 2–6; Struny 3–5; Struny 3–6; Struny 4–6; Jiné
tr: Kısmi kaponun kapsadığı teller: 1-3. teller; 1-4. teller; 1-5. teller; 2-4. teller; 2-5. teller; 2-6. teller; 3-5. teller; 3-6. teller; 4-6. teller; Diğer
ko: 부분 카포 적용 현: 1~3번 현; 1~4번 현; 1~5번 현; 2~4번 현; 2~5번 현; 2~6번 현; 3~5번 현; 3~6번 현; 4~6번 현; 기타
en: Partial capo covered strings: Strings 1–3; Strings 1–4; Strings 1–5; Strings 2–4; Strings 2–5; Strings 2–6; Strings 3–5; Strings 3–6; Strings 4–6; Other
ru: Количество струн частичного каподастра: Струны 1–3; Струны 1–4; Струны 1–5; Струны 2–4; Струны 2–5; Струны 2–6; Струны 3–5; Струны 3–6; Струны 4–6; Другое
pl: Zakres strun obejmowany przez kapodaster częściowy: Struny 1–3; Struny 1–4; Struny 1–5; Struny 2–4; Struny 2–5; Struny 2–6; Struny 3–5; Struny 3–6; Struny 4–6; Inne
vi: Dây đàn được che một phần bằng kẹp capo: Dây 1–3; Dây 1–4; Dây 1–5; Dây 2–4; Dây 2–5; Dây 2–6; Dây 3–5; Dây 3–6; Dây 4–6; Khác
fi: Osittaisen capon kattamat kielet: Kielet 1–3; Kielet 1–4; Kielet 1–5; Kielet 2–4; Kielet 2–5; Kielet 2–6; Kielet 3–5; Kielet 3–6; Kielet 4–6; Muu
zh-TW: 部分變調夾覆蓋琴弦: 弦 1–3; 弦 1–4; 弦 1–5; 弦 2–4; 弦 2–5; 弦 2–6; 弦 3–5; 弦 3–6; 弦 4–6; 其他
pt-PT: Cadeia parcialmente coberta por capo: Cordas 1–3; Cordas 1–4; Cordas 1–5; Cordas 2–4; Cordas 2–5; Cordas 2–6; Cordas 3–5; Cordas 3–6; Cordas 4–6; Outro
ro-RO: Corzi acoperite de capodastru parțial: Corzile 1–3; Corzile 1–4; Corzile 1–5; Corzile 2–4; Corzile 2–5; Corzile 2–6; Corzile 3–5; Corzile 3–6; Corzile 4–6; Altele
bg-BG: Частично покрити струни от каподастъра: Струни 1–3; Струни 1–4; Струни 1–5; Струни 2–4; Струни 2–5; Струни 2–6; Струни 3–5; Струни 3–6; Струни 4–6; Друго